Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-103.41
Wholesaler, defined.

Wholesaler means a person importing or causing to be imported into the state or purchasing or causing to be purchased within the state alcoholic liquor for sale or resale to retailers licensed under the Nebraska Liquor Control Act, whether the business of the wholesaler is conducted under the terms of a franchise or any other form of an agreement with a manufacturer or manufacturers, or who has caused alcoholic liquor to be imported into the state or purchased in the state from a manufacturer or manufacturers and was licensed to conduct such a business by the commission on May 1, 1970, or has been so licensed since that date.

Wholesaler includes a distributor, distributorship, and jobber.

Laws 2010, LB861, § 49;

Laws 2016, LB1105, § 9.